Washington statutes.
RCW 43.32.020

Duties of committee.

(1) On or before January 1, 1950, and from time to time thereafter, the design standards committee shall adopt uniform design standards for the county primary road systems.

(2) By July 1, 2012, and from time to time thereafter, the design standards committee shall adopt standards for bicycle and pedestrian facilities.

[ 2012 c 67 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.32.020. Prior: 1949 c 165 s 3; RRS s 6450-8j.]

NOTES:

Intent—2012 c 67: See note following RCW 35.75.060.

Design standards for county roads and bridges: Chapter 36.86 RCW.